public/third-party/apertium-translations/apertium-spa.spa.metadix
<pardef n="h/aber__vbhaver">
  <e>       <p><l>abríamos</l>  <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abría</l>     <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abríais</l>   <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abrías</l>    <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abrían</l>    <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abría</l>     <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abremos</l>   <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abré</l>      <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abréis</l>    <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abrás</l>     <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abrán</l>     <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abrá</l>      <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ubiéremos</l> <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ubiere</l>    <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ubiereis</l>  <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ubieres</l>   <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ubieren</l>   <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ubiere</l>    <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abiendo</l>   <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abiéndo</l>   <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubimos</l>    <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ube</l>       <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubisteis</l>  <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiste</l>    <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubieron</l>   <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubo</l>       <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aber</l>      <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aber</l>      <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abér</l>      <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantár"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abíamos</l>   <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abía</l>      <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abíais</l>    <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abías</l>     <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abían</l>     <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abía</l>      <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiéramos</l> <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ubiésemos</l> <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiera</l>    <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ubiese</l>    <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubierais</l>  <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ubieseis</l>  <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubieras</l>   <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ubieses</l>   <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubieran</l>   <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ubiesen</l>   <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiera</l>    <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ubiese</l>    <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abido</l>     <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abidos</l>    <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abida</l>     <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abidas</l>    <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emos</l>      <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abéis</l>     <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ayamos</l>    <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aya</l>       <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ayáis</l>     <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ayas</l>      <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ayan</l>      <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aya</l>       <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="h/aber__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>abría</l>     <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abrá</l>      <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ubiere</l>    <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubo</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aber</l>      <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abiendo</l>   <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abía</l>      <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiera</l>    <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ubiese</l>    <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aya</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    

<e lm="haber">           <i>h</i><par n="h/aber__vbhaver"/></e>
<e lm="haber">           <i>h</i><par n="h/aber__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="haber lugar"><i>h</i><par n="h/aber__vblex"/><p><l><b/>lugar</l><r><g><b/>lugar</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="haber lugar a">   <i>h</i><par n="h/aber__vblex"/><p><l><b/>lugar<b/>a</l><r><g><b/>lugar<b/>a</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="haber bastante">  <i>h</i><par n="h/aber__vblex"/><p><l><b/>bastante</l><r><g><b/>bastante</g></r></p></e>
